Washington statutes.
RCW 18.108.210

Authority of local political subdivisions.

Nothing in this chapter limits or abridges the authority of any political subdivision to levy and collect a general and nondiscriminatory license fee levied upon all businesses, or to levy a tax based upon gross business conducted by any firm within said political subdivision.

[ 2007 c 165 s 2; 1975 1st ex.s. c 280 s 22.]

NOTES:

Finding—2007 c 165: "The legislature finds that licensed massage practitioners should be treated the same as other health professionals under Title 18 RCW and that additional registrations or licenses regulating massage or massage practitioners are not authorized." [ 2007 c 165 s 1.]